Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 62 Military Personnel
12-62-803. Applicability.

This subchapter shall not be applicable to any of the following:

The State of Arkansas;

A state agency;

A political subdivision;

A city of the first class, a city of the second class, or an incorporated town;

A county;

A school district;

A public official; or

An agency, commission, board, committee, council, or department of any of the entities stated in this subdivision (a)(1).

This subchapter shall not be construed as creating a cause of action against an entity stated in subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

The provisions of this subchapter relating to employment shall not be applicable with respect to employment by a religious organization or other religious entity.

This subchapter shall not apply to matters regulated by the Arkansas Insurance Code or the Trade Practices Act, § 23-66-201 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. For codification of the Arkansas Insurance Code, see note at §23-60-101.

Subject to the limitations on damages in subdivision (d)(2) of this section, a person may seek the following relief for a violation of a civil right under this subchapter:

An order prohibiting the discriminatory practice;

Affirmative relief from the effects of the practice, including, but not limited to, reemployment;

An injunction to enjoin further violations;

An order to recover compensatory and punitive damages; and

An order to recover the cost of litigation and a reasonable attorney's fee, in the discretion of the court.

The total compensatory and punitive damages awarded under this section shall not exceed:

The sum of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) in the case of an employer who employs no fewer than five (5) but fewer than fifteen (15) employees in each of twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year before the cause of action arose;

The sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the case of an employer who employs more than fourteen (14) but fewer than one hundred one (101) employees in each of twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year before the cause of action arose;

The sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in the case of an employer who employs more than one hundred (100) but fewer than two hundred one (201) employees in each of twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year before the cause of action arose;

The sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in the case of an employer who employs more than two hundred (200) but fewer than five hundred one (501) employees in each of twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year before the cause of action arose; and

The sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in the case of an employer who employs more than five hundred (500) employees in each of twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year before the cause of action arose.

Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, an action under this subchapter shall be brought within one (1) year after the alleged violation or discriminatory conduct occurs.

However, if a service member is deployed for active duty at any time during the one-year period, then an action under this subchapter shall be brought within one (1) year after the end of his or her mobilization.

It is unlawful under this subchapter for a person or entity to retaliate or discriminate against a person because the person in good faith:

It is unlawful to coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with a person in his or her exercise of any right granted or protected under this subchapter.

A person may avail himself or herself of the same procedures and remedies available under § 12-62-805 for violations of this section.

It is a defense under this subchapter if an employer establishes that the employer's actions were based on legitimate, nondiscriminatory factors and not on reasons related to military service.

Provided the conduct at issue is based on a bona fide business judgment and is not a pretext for discrimination that is prohibited under this subchapter, this subchapter shall not be construed to prohibit or restrict:

A person covered by this subchapter from establishing, sponsoring, observing, or administering the terms of a bona fide benefit plan that is not subject to federal or state laws that regulate insurance.

Effective Dates. Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 55, § 5: Mar. 17, 1992. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that recent natural disasters have created a need for cooperation between the Arkansas National Guard and National Guard units of surrounding states regarding the use of equipment needed to respond to the emergency situations created by the natural disasters. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Acts 2005, No. 920, § 1.

12-62-804. Construction.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to waive the sovereign immunity of the State of Arkansas.

(1)When construing this subchapter as it relates to employment matters, a court may look for guidance to the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4301 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2005, as well as federal decisions interpreting the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4301 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2005.

When construing this subchapter as it relates to all other matters, a court may look for guidance to state and federal decisions interpreting the Civil Rights Act of 1871, 42 U.S.C. § 1983, as in effect on January 1, 2005.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 920, § 1.

12-62-805. Rights stated — Cause of action created.

(1)The right of an otherwise qualified person to be free from discrimination because of military service is recognized as and declared to be a civil right.

This right shall include, but not be limited to:

The right to obtain and hold employment without discrimination;

The right to the full enjoyment of any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement;

The right to engage in property transactions without discrimination;

The right to engage in credit and other contractual transactions without discrimination; and

The right to vote and participate fully in the political process.

A person who is injured by an intentional act of discrimination in violation of subsection (a) of this section may bring a civil action in a circuit court of competent jurisdiction.

(1)An employee who is discriminated against by an employer in violation of subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section may bring a civil action in a circuit court of competent jurisdiction.

The employee may seek back pay and interest on back pay in addition to the other remedies provided for under this section.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 920, § 1.

12-62-806. Limitation of action.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 920, § 1.

12-62-807. Retaliation — Interference — Remedies.

Opposed any act or practice made unlawful under this subchapter; or

Made a claim, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in an investigation, proceeding, or hearing under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 920, § 1.

12-62-808. Defenses.

An insurer, hospital, medical service company, health maintenance organization, or any agent or entity that administers benefit plans or any bank, savings and loan, or other lender from underwriting insurance or lending risks or administering such risks that are based on or are not inconsistent with federal or state law;

A person covered by this subchapter from establishing, sponsoring, observing, or administering the terms of a bona fide benefit plan that are based on underwriting risks, classifying risks, or administering such risks that are based on or are not inconsistent with federal or state law; or

History.

Acts 2005, No. 920, § 1.

Subchapter 7

— Arkansas Soldiers' and Airmen's Civil Relief Act